Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Article V. Rulemaking Procedure

§ 1811.
Rulemaking procedure.

Before promulgation of any regulations establishing a compact over-order price or Commission marketing order, including any provision with respect to milk supply under subsection 1809(f), or amendment thereof, as provided in Article IV, the Commission shall conduct an informal rulemaking proceeding to provide interested persons with an opportunity to present data and views. Such rulemaking proceeding shall be governed by section four of the federal Administrative Procedure Act, as amended (5 U.S.C. § 553).
In addition, the Commission shall, to the extent practicable, publish notice of rulemaking proceedings in the official register of each participating state. Before the initial adoption of regulations establishing a compact over-order price or a Commission marketing order and thereafter before any amendment with regard to prices or assessments, the Commission shall hold a public hearing. The Commission may commence a rulemaking proceeding on its own initiative or may, in its sole discretion, act upon the petition of any person including individual milk producers, any organization of milk producers or handlers, general farm organizations, consumer or public interest groups, and local, state, or federal officials.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1812.
Findings and referendum.

In addition to the concise general statement of basis and purpose required by section 4(b) of the federal Administrative Procedure Act, as amended (

5 U.S.C. § 553(c))

the Commission shall make findings of fact with respect to:

Whether the public interest will be served by the establishment of minimum milk prices to dairy farmers under Article IV.

What level of prices will assure that producers receive a price sufficient to cover their costs of production and will elicit an adequate supply of milk for the inhabitants of the regulated area and for manufacturing purposes.

Whether the major provisions of the order, other than those fixing minimum milk prices, are in the public interest and are reasonably designed to achieve the purposes of the order.

Whether the terms of the proposed regional order or amendment are approved by producers as provided in section 1813 of this compact.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1813.
Producer referendum.

For the purpose of ascertaining whether the issuance or amendment of regulations establishing a compact over-order price or a Commission marketing order, including any provision with respect to milk supply under subsection 1809(f) of this title, is approved by producers, the Commission shall conduct a referendum among producers. The referendum shall be held in a timely manner, as determined by regulation of the Commission. The terms and conditions of the proposed order or amendment shall be described by the Commission in the ballot used in the conduct of the referendum, but the nature, content, or extent of such description shall not be a basis for attacking the legality of the order or any action relating thereto.

An order or amendment shall be deemed approved by producers if the Commission determines that it is approved by at least two-thirds of the voting producers who, during a representative period determined by the Commission, have been engaged in the production of milk, the price of which would be regulated under the proposed order or amendment.

For purposes of any referendum, the Commission shall consider the approval or disapproval by any cooperative association of producers, qualified under the provisions of the Act of Congress of February 18, 1922, as amended, known as the Capper-Volstead Act, bona fide engaged in marketing milk or in rendering services for or advancing the interests of producers of such commodity, as the approval or disapproval of the producers who are members or stockholders in, or under contract with, such cooperative association of producers, except as provided in subdivision (1) of this subsection and subject to the provisions of subdivisions (2) through (5) of this subsection.

No cooperative which has been formed to act as a common marketing agency for both cooperatives and individual producers shall be qualified to block vote for either.

Any cooperative which is qualified to block vote shall, before submitting its approval or disapproval in any referendum, give prior written notice to each of its members as to whether and how it intends to cast its vote. The notice shall be given in a timely manner as established, and in the form prescribed, by the Commission.

Any producer may obtain a ballot from the Commission in order to register approval or disapproval of the proposed order.

A producer who is a member of a cooperative which has provided notice of its intent to approve or not to approve a proposed order, and who obtains a ballot and with such ballot expresses his or her approval or disapproval of the proposed order, shall notify the Commission as to the name of the cooperative of which he or she is a member, and the Commission shall remove such producer’s name from the list certified by such cooperative with its corporate vote.

In order to ensure that all milk producers are informed regarding a proposed order, the Commission shall notify all milk producers that an order is being considered and that each producer may register his or her approval or disapproval with the Commission either directly or through his or her cooperative.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.

§ 1814.
Termination of over-order price or marketing order.

The Commission shall terminate any regulations establishing an over-order price or Commission marketing order issued under this article whenever it finds that such order or price obstructs or does not tend to effectuate the declared policy of this compact.

The Commission shall terminate any regulations establishing an over-order price or a Commission marketing order issued under this article whenever it finds that such termination is favored by a majority of the producers who, during a representative period determined by the Commission, have been engaged in the production of milk, the price of which is regulated by such order; but such termination shall be effective only if announced on or before such date as may be specified in such marketing agreement or order.

The termination or suspension of any order or provision thereof shall not be considered an order within the meaning of this article and shall require no hearing, but shall comply with the requirements for informal rulemaking prescribed by section four of the federal Administrative Procedure Act, as amended (5 U.S.C. § 553).

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 57

, § 1, eff. June 3, 1993.